Massachusetts, session 194th, H5285.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
Chapter 71 of the Acts of 2021 are hereby amended by adding the following section after
section 98.
Section 99. (a) the Department of Elementary and Secondary Education, in consultation
with the Department of Early Education and Care, shall, subject to appropriation, issue
guidelines to assist districts in developing k-12 education on neurodiversity.
(b) There is hereby established a commission to study and make recommendations on
neurodiversity education in early childhood, elementary, and secondary public school education.
The commission shall consist of 9 members; the secretary of health and human services, or a
designee, who shall serve as chair; 1 member of the house of representatives, to be appointed by
the speaker of the house; 1 member of the Senate, to be appointed by the president of the senate;
3 members to be appointed by the governor, 2 of whom shall be neurodiverse adults, 1 of whom
shall be a representative from the Department of Elementary and Secondary Education, 1 of
of 2

whom shall be a representative from the Department of Early Education and Care, and a
representative of the Massachusetts American Federation of Teachers.
The commission shall report its findings and recommendations to the governor and the
clerks of the house of representatives and the senate, including any recommendations for
legislation or regulations, within 4 months of the effective date of this act.
of 2